hr-HR: Podesivost glasnoće alarma: Prilagodljivo; Fiksno; Ostalo
pt-BR: Ajuste do volume do alarme: Ajustável; Fixo; Outro
pt-PT: Ajustabilidade do volume do alarme: Ajustável; Fixo; Outro
es: Ajuste del volumen de la alarma: Ajustable; Fijo; Otro
ro-RO: Reglarea volumului alarmei: Ajustabil; Fix; Altele
nl: Instelbaarheid alarmvolume: Instelbaar; Vast; Overig
fi: Hälytyksen äänenvoimakkuuden säädettävyys: Säädettävä; Kiinteä; Muu
tr: Alarm ses seviyesi ayarlanabilirliği: Ayarlanabilir; Sabit; Diğer
sv: Justerbar larmvolym: Justerbar; Fast; Annan
lt-LT: Signalo garsumo reguliavimas: Reguliuojamas; Fiksuotas; Kita
vi: Khả năng điều chỉnh âm lượng báo động: Có thể điều chỉnh; Cố định; Khác
de: Einstellbarkeit der Alarmlautstärke: Einstellbar; Fest; Sonstige
nb: Justerbart alarmvolum: Justerbar; Fast; Annet
ko: 알람 음량 조절 기능: 조절식; 고정식; 기타
ja: アラーム音量調整機能: 調整可能; 固定; その他
th: การปรับระดับเสียงสัญญาณเตือน: ปรับได้; คงที่; อื่นๆ
pl: Możliwość regulacji głośności alarmu: Regulowana; Stała; Inna
da: Justering af alarmlydstyrke: Justerbar; Fast; Andet
fr: Réglage du volume de l’alarme: Réglable; Fixe; Autre
cs: Nastavitelnost hlasitosti budíku: Nastavitelná; Pevná; Jiná
it: Regolazione del volume dell'allarme: Regolabile; Fisso; Altro
zh-TW: 警報音量調節: 可調式; 固定式; 其他
el: Δυνατότητα ρύθμισης έντασης συναγερμού: Ρυθμιζόμενη; Σταθερή; Άλλο
en: Alarm volume adjustability: Adjustable; Fixed; Other
sk-SK: Nastaviteľnosť hlasitosti budíka: Nastaviteľná; Pevná; Iná
zh-CN: 警报音量可调性: 可调节; 固定; 其他
bg-BG: Регулиране на силата на звука на алармата: Регулируемо; Фиксирано; Друго
ru: Регулировка громкости сигнала тревоги: Регулируемое; Фиксированное; Другое
sl-SI: Nastavljivost glasnosti alarma: Nastavljiva; Fiksna; Drugo
hu: Riasztási hangerő állíthatósága: Állítható; Fix; Egyéb